Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF552.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1578YH (9) 91 jda/jh H.F. 552 Section 1. Section 299.1, subsection 4, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. The board of directors of a public school district 3 shall adopt a policy or rules relating to children students 4 who are chronically absent. The policy or rules must contain 5 provisions that clearly explain all of the following: 6 (1) How the board of directors determines whether a child 7 student is chronically absent. 8 (2) The different interventions that the board of directors 9 may use when a child student is chronically absent. 10 (3) The different penalties associated with a child student 11 being chronically absent. 12 Sec. 2. Section 299.1, subsection 4, paragraph b, 13 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as 14 follows: 15 The policy or rules adopted by the board of directors of a 16 public school district pursuant to paragraph âaâ must not apply 17 to any child student : 18 Sec. 3. Section 299.1, subsection 4, paragraph b, 19 subparagraph (5), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 20 (5) Who has an individualized education program that 21 affects the childâs studentâs attendance. 22 Sec. 4. Section 299.6, Code 2025, is amended to read as 23 follows: 24 299.6 Violations ââ community service or fine or 25 imprisonment. 26 1. Any A person who violates commits a public offense if the 27 person does any of the following: 28 a. Violates the terms of an absenteeism prevention 29 plan entered into under section 299.12 , who is referred 30 for prosecution under section 299.12 and is convicted of a 31 violation of any of the provisions of sections 299.1 through 32 299.5 , who violates any of the provisions of sections 299.1 33 through 299.5 , or who refuses . 34 b. Refuses to participate in a school engagement meeting 35 -1- LSB 1578YH (9) 91 jda/jh 1/ 8 H.F. 552 under section 299.12 , commits a public offense . 1 c. The person is a parent, guardian, or legal or actual 2 custodian of a child who is of compulsory attendance age, the 3 parent, guardian, or legal or actual custodian has failed to 4 cause the child to attend a public school or an accredited 5 nonpublic school, or to place the child under competent private 6 instruction or independent private instruction in the manner 7 provided in this chapter, and the child is truant. 8 2. a. A first offense is a simple misdemeanor and a 9 conviction is punishable by imprisonment not exceeding ten days 10 or a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars. The court may 11 order the person to perform not more than forty hours of unpaid 12 community service instead of any fine or imprisonment. 13 b. A second offense is a serious misdemeanor and a 14 conviction is punishable by imprisonment not exceeding twenty 15 days or a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars, or both 16 a fine and imprisonment. The court may order the person 17 to perform unpaid community service instead of any fine or 18 imprisonment. 19 c. A third or subsequent offense is a serious misdemeanor 20 and a conviction is punishable by imprisonment not exceeding 21 thirty days or a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars, or 22 both a fine and imprisonment. The court may order the person 23 to perform unpaid community service instead of any fine or 24 imprisonment. 25 2. 3. If community service is imposed as part of a 26 sentencing order, the court may require that part or all of 27 the service be performed for a public school district or 28 nonpublic school if the court finds that service in the school 29 is appropriate under the circumstances. 30 3. 4. If a parent, guardian, or legal or actual custodian 31 of a child who is truant, has made reasonable efforts to 32 comply with the provisions of sections 299.1 through 299.5 , 33 but is unable to cause the child to attend school, the parent, 34 guardian, or legal or actual custodian may file an affidavit 35 -2- LSB 1578YH (9) 91 jda/jh 2/ 8 H.F. 552 listing the reasonable efforts made by the parent, guardian, or 1 legal or actual custodian to cause the childâs attendance and 2 the parent, guardian, or legal or actual custodian shall not be 3 criminally liable for the childâs nonattendance. 4 Sec. 5. Section 299.12, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 5 by adding the following new paragraph: 6 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0a. âAbsentâ means when a student is not 7 present at school unless the student is not present at school 8 due to an exception described in section 299.1, subsection 4, 9 paragraph âbâ , or section 299.2, that applies to the student. 10 Sec. 6. Section 299.12, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 11 2025, is amended to read as follows: 12 a. When a child student becomes chronically absent, a school 13 official shall send a notice by ordinary mail or electronic 14 mail that includes information related to the studentâs 15 absences from school and the policies and disciplinary 16 processes associated with additional absences to the all of the 17 following individuals: 18 (1) The county attorney of the county in which the public 19 schoolâs central administrative office is located , and a notice 20 by certified mail to the childâs . 21 (2) The studentâs parent, guardian, or legal or actual 22 custodian of the child student , if the child student is not an 23 emancipated minor , or to the child . 24 (3) The student , if the child student is an emancipated 25 minor , that includes information related to the childâs 26 absences from school and the policies and disciplinary 27 processes associated with additional absences . 28 Sec. 7. Section 299.12, subsection 2, paragraph b, 29 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as 30 follows: 31 A school official may send the notice described in paragraph 32 âaâ prior to a child at risk of student becoming chronically 33 absent if all of the following requirements are satisfied: 34 Sec. 8. Section 299.12, subsection 3, paragraph a, 35 -3- LSB 1578YH (9) 91 jda/jh 3/ 8 H.F. 552 subparagraphs (1) and (2), Code 2025, are amended to read as 1 follows: 2 (1) If a child student is absent from school for greater 3 than or equal to fifteen percent of the days or hours in the 4 grading period, a school official shall attempt to find the 5 cause for the childâs studentâs absences and shall initiate 6 and participate in a school engagement meeting. The purpose 7 of the school engagement meeting is to identify the childâs 8 studentâs barriers to attendance and the interventions that 9 may be used to improve the childâs studentâs attendance. The 10 school official shall send a notice by certified mail to the 11 studentâs parent, guardian, or legal or actual custodian of the 12 student, if the student is not an emancipated minor, or to the 13 student, if the student is an emancipated minor, regarding the 14 school engagement meeting that includes information related 15 to the policies and disciplinary processes associated with 16 additional absences and failing to participate in the school 17 engagement meeting. 18 (2) A school official may initiate and participate in a 19 school engagement meeting as provided in subparagraph (1) prior 20 to a child student being absent from school for greater than 21 or equal to fifteen percent of the days or hours in a school 22 calendar. 23 Sec. 9. Section 299.12, subsection 3, paragraph b, 24 subparagraphs (1) and (2), Code 2025, are amended to read as 25 follows: 26 (1) The child student . 27 (2) The childâs studentâs parent, guardian, or legal or 28 actual custodian, if the child student is not an emancipated 29 minor. 30 Sec. 10. Section 299.12, subsection 3, paragraph c, 31 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 32 (1) During the school engagement meeting, the participants 33 shall create and sign an agreement that shall be known as 34 an absenteeism prevention plan. Each participant signing 35 -4- LSB 1578YH (9) 91 jda/jh 4/ 8 H.F. 552 the absenteeism prevention plan shall receive a copy of 1 the plan. The absenteeism prevention plan shall identify 2 the causes of the childâs studentâs absences and the future 3 responsibilities of each participant related to the childâs 4 studentâs attendance. 5 Sec. 11. Section 299.12, subsection 3, paragraphs e and f, 6 Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 7 e. If the participants in the school engagement meeting fail 8 to enter into an absenteeism prevention plan, or if the child 9 student or the childâs studentâs parent, guardian, or legal or 10 actual custodian violates a term of the absenteeism prevention 11 plan or fails to participate in the school engagement meeting, 12 the county attorney may initiate a proceeding under section 13 299.6 . 14 f. This subsection is not applicable to a child student 15 who is receiving competent private instruction or independent 16 private instruction in accordance with the requirements of 17 chapter 299A . 18